Illinois, session 104th, HB4732.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Lead-Safe Water for Families Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 8        (1) Lead exposure poses serious health risks, 9    especially to children and pregnant women, including 10    developmental delays, learning difficulties, behavioral 11    problems, and adverse pregnancy outcomes. 12        (2) Lead can leach into drinking water from lead 13    service lines, plumbing fixtures, and solder in older 14    homes. 15        (3) Low-income families are disproportionately 16    affected by lead exposure due to older housing stock and 17    limited resources to address contamination. 18        (4) Point-of-use water filters certified to remove 19    lead provide an effective interim protection measure while 20    comprehensive infrastructure improvements are underway. 21    (b) The purpose of this Act is to provide free 22lead-reducing water filters to Medicaid-eligible households 23with children or expectant mothers to protect these vulnerable   HB4732- 2 -LRB104 17906 BDA 33942 b1populations from lead exposure through drinking water. 2    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 3    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 4Services. 5    "Eligible household" means a household that: 6        (1) includes at least one child under 18 years of age 7    or an expectant mother; and 8        (2) includes at least one individual enrolled in 9    medical assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public 10    Aid Code. 11    "Expectant mother" means a woman who is pregnant.12    "Lead-reducing water filter" means a point-of-use drinking 13water filter or filtration system that is certified by NSF 14International or another nationally recognized testing 15organization to NSF/ANSI Standard 53 for lead reduction or an 16equivalent standard.  17    Section 15. Lead-reducing water filter program. 18    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall 19establish and administer a program to provide lead-reducing 20water filters at no cost to eligible households. 21    (b) The program shall provide: 22        (1) one lead-reducing water filter system per eligible 23    household; and 24        (2) replacement filters as needed for a period of at   HB4732- 3 -LRB104 17906 BDA 33942 b1    least 2 years from initial installation, or as recommended 2    by the manufacturer for effective lead reduction. 3    (c) The Department may contract with one or more qualified 4vendors to: 5        (1) procure lead-reducing water filters meeting the 6    requirements of this Act; 7        (2) distribute filters to eligible households; 8        (3) provide installation assistance or instructions; 9    and 10        (4) provide replacement filters to participating 11    households. 12    (d) The Department shall conduct outreach to inform 13eligible households about the availability of lead-reducing 14water filters under this program through: 15        (1) direct mailings to Medicaid enrollees; 16        (2) coordination with managed care organizations; 17        (3) partnerships with local health departments, 18    community organizations, and healthcare providers; and 19        (4) publication of program information on the 20    Department's website. 21    (e) The Department shall establish a simple application 22and distribution process that minimizes administrative burden 23on eligible households. 24    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 25necessary to implement this Act, including, but not limited   HB4732- 4 -LRB104 17906 BDA 33942 b1to, application procedures, verification of eligibility, 2filter specifications and certification requirements, 3distribution methods, replacement filter provisions, and 4reporting requirements for contracted vendors. 5    Section 25. Reporting. No later than January 1, 2028, and 6annually thereafter, the Department shall submit a report to 7the General Assembly that includes the number of eligible 8households served, the geographic distribution of 9participating households, the number of filters and 10replacement cartridges distributed, program costs, and any 11recommendations for program improvements or expansion.